North Carolina, session 2025, SB881.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the Boys & Girls Clubs of the
Coastal Plain Foundation for operational expenses and expansion of programs. These funds shall
be used for the Clubs in Pitt County only.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S881-v-1*